Utah statutes.
78B-5-101.   Right to jury trial.

In actions for the recovery of specific real or personal property, with or without damages, or for money claimed due upon contract or as damages for breach of contract, or for injuries, an issue of fact may be tried by a jury, unless a jury trial is waived or a reference is ordered.

